Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2712.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 33, chapter 10, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 33-1379.01, to read: START_STATUTE33-1379.01. Evictions; forcible entry and detainer; court report In any action for eviction pursuant to section 33-1368 or 33-1377 or pursuant to a forcible entry and detainer action, if the court enters a judgment in favor of the landlord, the court shall compile a report of the eviction or forcible entry and detainer action.  The report must: 1. Be categorized by the city or town and the county in which the eviction or the forcible entry and detainer action occurred. 2. Include the reason for the eviction or forcible entry and detainer action. 3. be available to the public. END_STATUTE